District of Columbia statutes.
3-401

Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to provide for the licensure and regulation of funeral directors, apprentice funeral directors, and funeral services establishments in the District of Columbia, and to protect the public from fraudulent, unfair, and deceptive practices by persons licensed to provide funeral directing services.

History

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 2, 31 DCR 1815

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2801.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-84, see Mayor’s Order 87-186, August 3, 1987.
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 5-84, the District of Columbia Funeral Services Regulatory Act of 1984, see Mayor’s Order 2007-216, October 5, 2007 ( 55 DCR 149).

Editor's Notes

Although a new Board of Funeral Directors has been established by the Second Omnibus Regulatory Reform Act of 1998, effective April 20, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-261), codified under D.C. Official Code § 47-2853.06(f), the old board, codified under D.C. Official Code § 3-401 et seq. has not been abolished by law.